Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1523
Corporate trustee;
fine; when.

(1) Any corporate trustee
failing to report the information required by section 76-1520 or filing false
information shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars.

(2) Any fines received pursuant
to this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article
VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 1998, LB 1193, § 4;

Laws 2011, LB160, § 3.